Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Unified and Integrated Prosecutor System

15.700.
Unified and integrated prosecutor system established.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of this Commonwealth to encourage cooperation among law enforcement officers and to provide for the general supervision of criminal justice by the Attorney General as chief law enforcement officer of the Commonwealth, in order to maintain uniform and efficient enforcement of the criminal law and the administration of criminal justice throughout the Commonwealth. To this end, a unified and integrated prosecutor system is hereby established with the Attorney General as chief prosecutor of the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 17, § 1, effective January 1, 1978.

15.705.
Prosecutors Advisory Council.

For the purpose of administration of the unified prosecutorial system, there is hereby created the Prosecutors Advisory Council, hereafter referred to as the council.

The council shall consist of thirteen (13) members who shall be residents of Kentucky and shall include:

The Attorney General or his or her designee;

Five (5) Commonwealth’s attorneys:

One (1) from the First Judicial Circuit to the Nineteenth Judicial Circuit;

One (1) from the Twentieth Judicial Circuit to the Thirty-eighth Judicial Circuit;

One (1) from the Thirty-ninth Judicial Circuit to the Fifty-seventh Judicial Circuit; and

Two (2) from any judicial circuit who shall serve at large;

each of whom shall be elected by the membership of the Commonwealth’s Attorneys Association;

Five (5) county attorneys:

One (1) from a county with a population equal to or greater than seventy-five thousand (75,000) based on the most recent federal decennial census;

One (1) from a county with a population equal to or greater than twenty-five thousand (25,000) but less than seventy-five thousand (75,000) based on the most recent federal decennial census;

One (1) from a county with a population of less than twenty-five thousand (25,000) based on the most recent federal decennial census; and

Two (2) from any other county who shall serve at large;

each of whom shall be elected by the membership of the County Attorneys Association; and

Two (2) nonattorney citizen members:

One (1) appointed by the Attorney General from a list of three (3) names submitted by the Commonwealth’s Attorneys Association; and

One (1) appointed by the Attorney General from a list of three (3) names submitted by the County Attorneys Association.

The Attorney General shall serve during his or her term of office and the other members shall serve for a term of two (2) years. A Commonwealth’s attorney or a county attorney shall not serve more than two (2) consecutive terms.

The Attorney General or his or her designee shall be the chair of the council. Seven (7) members shall constitute a quorum for the conduct of business. The council shall promulgate annually a schedule of meetings. Special meetings may be called by the chair or seven (7) members of the council. A minimum of ten (10) days’ notice must be given prior to the call of a special meeting. The notice may be waived by a majority of the council.

The council shall be responsible for, but not limited to:

The preparation of the budget of the unified prosecutorial system of the Commonwealth of Kentucky;

The continuing legal education and program development of the unified prosecutorial system of Kentucky; and

Proposing and adopting a code of ethics for prosecutors within the unified prosecutorial system.

The council shall provide the proposed budget of the unified prosecutorial system of the Commonwealth of Kentucky to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue each biennium.

Each nonattorney citizen member of the council shall receive twenty-five dollars ($25) per day for attending each meeting. All council members shall be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 17, § 2, effective January 1, 1977; 1978, ch. 154, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 2014, ch. 92, § 21, effective January 1, 2015; 2022 ch. 209, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Underwood, Part-Time Prosecutors and Conflicts
of Interest: A Survey and Some Proposals, 81 Ky. L.J. 1 (1993).

15.706.
Prosecutors Advisory Council to collect data on sexual offenses involving minors.

The Prosecutors Advisory Council shall collect statistical data regarding the investigation, prosecution, dismissal, conviction, or acquittal of any person charged with committing, attempting to commit, or complicity to a sexual offense defined by KRS Chapter 510 involving a minor, human trafficking offenses involving a minor engaged in commercial sexual activity, incest involving a minor, use of a minor in a sexual performance, or unlawful transaction with a minor.

Each Commonwealth’s attorney, each county attorney, the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police, each Circuit Court clerk, and the Administrative Office of the Courts shall provide any data requested by the council for this purpose, on a form prescribed by the council, at intervals as the council may direct.

The council may contract with any other public agency to collect the data in lieu of collecting the data itself.

The Prosecutors Advisory Council may promulgate administrative regulations to specify information to be reported.

The information required to be reported by this section shall be provided by each Commonwealth’s attorney and county attorney at the end of each quarter of the calendar year or as otherwise directed by the Prosecutors Advisory Council.

The Prosecutors Advisory Council and the Office of the Attorney General shall compile the information by county and issue a public report at least annually.

The public report shall not contain the name or identifying information of a victim or person not formally charged with the commission of child sexual abuse or human trafficking of a child. Information collected by the Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney or by the Prosecutors Advisory Council containing data which cannot be published shall be excluded from inspection, unless by court order, from the Open Records Law.

Any Commonwealth’s attorney or any county attorney who fails to report information as defined by this section or administrative regulation shall be subject to salary reduction as authorized by KRS

61.120

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 264, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 66, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 82, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 33, effective June 26, 2007; 2013, ch. 25, § 15, effective June 25, 2013.

15.707.
Subpoena power of Prosecutors Advisory Council. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Prosecutors Advisory Council shall have the power to issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of such witnesses and the production of such records, books, papers, and documents as it may deem necessary for investigation of any matter that it is authorized to consider or reasonably necessary therefor. Subpoenas may be signed and oaths administered by any member of the council. Subpoenas so issued shall be served by any sheriff, constable, police officer, or other peace officer at the request of the council, and a return of subpoena shall be made to the council in the same manner as similar process in the Circuit Court. Any person who refuses to testify, testifies falsely, or fails to appear when subpoenaed, or fails or refuses to produce documents, records, or other such material when subpoenaed, or fails or refuses to serve a subpoena or execute a return thereon, upon citation by the Franklin Circuit Court and after hearing by the court, shall be subject to the same order and penalties to which persons before that court are subject. Any Circuit Court, upon application of the council or the Attorney General, may compel the attendance of witnesses, the production of documents, records, or other such material, and the giving of testimony before the council.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 419, § 3, effective April 10, 1990.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Commonwealth’s Attorneys are not covered by the provisions of KRS 11A. Rather, KRS 15 contains specific statutory directives regarding ethical consideration related to prosecutorial practice that governs Commonwealth’s Attorneys.

OAG 2005-09

.

15.707.
Subpoena power of Prosecutors Advisory Council. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Prosecutors Advisory Council shall have the power to issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of such witnesses and the production of such records, books, papers, and documents as it may deem necessary for investigation of any matter that it is authorized to consider or reasonably necessary therefor. Subpoenas may be signed and oaths administered by any member of the council. Subpoenas so issued shall be served by any sheriff, police officer, or other peace officer at the request of the council, and a return of subpoena shall be made to the council in the same manner as similar process in the Circuit Court. Any person who refuses to testify, testifies falsely, or fails to appear when subpoenaed, or fails or refuses to produce documents, records, or other such material when subpoenaed, or fails or refuses to serve a subpoena or execute a return thereon, upon citation by the Franklin Circuit Court and after hearing by the court, shall be subject to the same order and penalties to which persons before that court are subject. Any Circuit Court, upon application of the council or the Attorney General, may compel the attendance of witnesses, the production of documents, records, or other such material, and the giving of testimony before the council.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 419, § 3, effective April 10, 1990; 2022 ch. 90, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

15.708.
Authority of Prosecutors Advisory Council to apply for and receive funds.

The Prosecutors Advisory Council may apply for and receive funds, public or private, for the purpose of assisting Commonwealth’s and county attorneys in providing crime victim assistance or in criminal prosecution. The council may provide matching funds as a condition of any grant.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 264, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.

15.710.
Delegation of functions to Attorney General.

The council in its sole discretion may delegate the following functions to the Office of the Attorney General:

Prepare budget estimates of state appropriations necessary for the maintenance and operation of the unified prosecutorial system and make recommendations in respect thereto.

Collect statistical and other data and make a report to the council relating to the expenditure of public moneys for the maintenance and operation of the unified prosecutorial system and the offices connected therewith.

Carry on a continuous survey and study of the organization, operation, condition of business, practice and procedure of the unified prosecutorial system.

Formulate and submit to the council recommendations of policies for the improvement of the unified prosecutorial system.

Provide for educational programs for the members of the unified prosecutorial system.

Perform such other functions as may be assigned by the council.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 17, § 3, effective January 1, 1977.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Underwood, Part-Time Prosecutors and Conflicts
of Interest: A Survey and Some Proposals, 81 Ky. L.J. 1 (1993).

15.715.
Intervention in criminal prosecutions by Attorney General — Prosecution of complaint against local prosecutor — Performance of duties of local prosecutor until vacancy filled.

In the event of the incapacity, refusal without sufficient grounds, inability, conflict of interest of the local prosecutor, or his failure to act in a certain case or cases, the council may authorize, by the vote of no less than five (5) of its members, the Attorney General to initiate, intervene, or supersede a local prosecutor for the purpose of prosecuting the criminal business in question of the Commonwealth in that circuit or district after due notice having been given to the local prosecutor.

When the Attorney General shall proceed under subsection (1) of this section, he shall petition the Circuit Court of that circuit to disqualify the county attorney or Commonwealth’s attorney for good cause shown, when the county attorney or Commonwealth’s attorney refuses to disqualify himself. The action of the Circuit Court shall be subject to review according to the Rules of the Supreme Court.

If the Attorney General’s petition to disqualify the local prosecutor was sustained by the Circuit Court, the Attorney General shall file and prosecute a complaint against the local prosecutor pursuant to KRS

61.120

.

If the office of Commonwealth’s attorney or the office of county attorney becomes vacant, the Attorney General or his designee shall perform the duties of that office until such time as the successor of that Commonwealth’s attorney or of that county attorney shall be appointed or elected as elsewhere provided by law or until the Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney resumes the duties of his office as provided by law.

When the Attorney General has been authorized to participate in a given case pursuant to subsections (1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section, he may, at his own discretion, direct a Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney from another circuit or district to serve as the special prosecutor, who shall be reimbursed for all of his actual expenses.

The Attorney General shall have the duty, within the Forty-eighth Judicial Circuit, to prosecute any person who receives compensation from the Treasury of the Commonwealth of Kentucky for all violations of the criminal and penal laws arising out of, involving or in connection with state funds, or the sale or transfer of goods or services by or to the Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions; and specifically including, but not limited to, all violations set forth in KRS Chapters 521 and 522. Nothing herein shall be construed to change the venue provision presently existing under Kentucky law as of July 15, 1980.

Whenever the Attorney General shall undertake any of the actions prescribed in this section, he shall be authorized to exercise all powers and perform all duties in respect to such criminal actions or proceedings which the prosecuting attorney would otherwise perform or exercise, including, but not limited to, the authority to sign, file, and present any and all complaints, affidavits, information, presentments, accusations, indictments, subpoenas, and processes of any kind, and to appear before all grand juries, courts, or tribunals.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 17, § 4, effective January 1, 1978; 1980, ch. 42, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1990, ch. 419, § 1, effective April 10, 1990.

15.717.
Development of prosecutor’s manual.

The Attorney General, in consultation with legal, victims services, victim advocacy, and mental health professionals with an expertise in domestic violence, shall develop a prosecutor’s manual for Commonwealth’s Attorneys and county attorneys establishing the policies and procedures for the prosecution of domestic violence related crime. The manual shall be completed no later than January 1 after July 15, 1996, and revised by July 31 of every even numbered year which follows. The Attorney General shall distribute a copy of the manual to every Commonwealth’s Attorney and county attorney.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 54, § 5, effective July 15, 1996.

15.718.
Training and continuing education for Commonwealth’s attorneys and county attorneys and their staffs — Completion requirements.

The Attorney General shall provide initial training courses and, at least once every two (2) years, continuing education courses for Commonwealth’s attorneys and county attorneys and their staffs concerning:

The dynamics of domestic violence, child physical and sexual abuse, rape, effects of crime on adult and child victims, legal remedies for protection, lethality and risk issues, profiles of offenders, model protocols for addressing domestic violence, child abuse, rape, available community resources and victims services, and reporting requirements; and

The appropriate response to victims of human trafficking, including but not limited to screening for victims of human trafficking, federal and state legislation on human trafficking, appropriate services and referrals for victims of human trafficking, working with interpreters, and agency protocol for handling child trafficking cases.

The training shall be developed in consultation with prosecutors, victims services, victim advocacy, and mental health professionals with an expertise in domestic violence, child abuse, human trafficking, and rape.

Each Commonwealth’s Attorney, assistant Commonwealth’s Attorney, county attorney, and assistant county attorney shall successfully complete the training.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 54, § 6, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 317, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2013, ch. 25, § 16, effective June 25, 2013.

15.720.
Reports.

The Attorney General shall submit:

To the Governor and to the General Assembly a biennial report setting forth the activities of the unified prosecutorial system for the preceding fiscal years; to be included in this report are the activities of the Prosecutors Advisory Council, an abstract of the annual report of the local prosecutors, and suggestions and recommendations for the uniform enforcement of the criminal laws of the Commonwealth; and

To the Legislative Research Commission an annual report, by January 15 of each year, setting forth the total number of traffic offenders diverted into county attorney-operated traffic safety programs for the preceding fiscal year categorized by county and by traffic offense, and the fee charged by each county attorney-operated traffic safety program.

Each Commonwealth’s attorney and county attorney shall be required by the council to submit such written reports as are determined necessary for the preceding calendar year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 17, § 5, effective January 1, 1977; 2012, ch. 107, § 2, effective July 12, 2012.

15.725.
Duties of Commonwealth’s attorney and county attorneys — Agreements to share or redistribute prosecutorial duties — Circuit clerk’s authority to issue criminal warrants.

The Commonwealth’s attorney shall attend each Circuit Court held in his judicial circuit. He shall, except as provided in KRS

15.715

and KRS Chapter 131, have the duty to prosecute all violations whether by adults or by juveniles subject to the jurisdiction of the Circuit Court of the criminal and penal laws which are to be tried in the Circuit Court in his judicial circuit. In addition, he shall have the primary responsibility within his judicial circuit to present evidence to the grand jury concerning such violations.

The county attorney shall attend the District Court in his county and prosecute all violations whether by adults or by juveniles subject to the jurisdiction of the regular or juvenile session of the District Court of criminal and penal laws, except as provided in KRS Chapter 131, within the jurisdiction of said District Court.

The Commonwealth’s attorney and county attorneys in a judicial circuit shall cooperate in the enforcement of criminal and penal laws of the Commonwealth. When necessary, the Commonwealth’s attorney and county attorney shall assist each other in prosecution within their respective courts. Each Commonwealth’s attorney and county attorney may enter into agreements to share or redistribute prosecutorial duties in the Circuit and District Courts. Any prosecutorial or related duty assigned by statute to the Commonwealth’s attorney may be performed by the county attorney, and any prosecutorial or related duty assigned by statute to the county attorney may be performed by the Commonwealth’s attorney pursuant to these agreements. Copies of the agreements shall when executed be forwarded to the Attorney General, the chief judges of the Circuit and District Courts, and the chief regional judges of the Circuit and District Courts.

The Prosecutors Advisory Council shall in allocating resources between the Commonwealth’s and county attorney take the agreements into account.

In the event of the absence from a county of all District Judges and all Circuit Judges and all trial commissioners, the circuit clerk in each county may issue criminal warrants prepared by the Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney, who shall certify that there is no District Judge, Circuit Judge, or trial commissioner within the county.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 17, § 6, effective January 1, 1978; 1978, ch. 25, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 42, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1988, ch. 322, § 11, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 189, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 358, § 3, effective July 15, 1997.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/96). Under 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 358, sec. 67(1), the amendment of this statute by Section 3 of that Act becomes effective July 15, 1997.

15.727.
Duty of Commonwealth’s attorney and county attorney to assist child sexual abuse multidisciplinary team.

Pursuant to KRS

431.600

, each Commonwealth’s attorney and each county attorney shall assist any child sexual abuse multidisciplinary team established in his circuit or county, unless the Prosecutors Advisory Council has voted to relieve him of this responsibility.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 264, § 3, effective July 15, 1994.

15.728.
Notification to Office of Charitable Gaming of investigation or prosecution of violation of charitable gaming laws.

All law enforcement agencies and investigative bodies shall notify the Department of Charitable Gaming of any investigation or prosecution of any violation of the charitable gaming laws as soon as reasonably possible after commencing the investigation or prosecution and shall coordinate any investigation with the department.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 331, § 1, effective April 10, 1996; 2000, ch. 374, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 24, § 18, effective July 15, 2010.

15.730.
Commonwealth’s attorneys and county attorneys as special prosecutors.

Each regular Commonwealth’s attorney and county attorney shall be, ex officio, a special prosecutor of the Commonwealth, and as such shall perform such duties and render such services, at such time and places, coextensive with the Commonwealth as may be required by the Attorney General. The duties and services may include, but are not limited to, prosecution of or participation in action outside of his judicial circuit or judicial district when directed by the Attorney General and assisting the Attorney General in preparation and presentation of the Commonwealth’s position in criminal cases appealed to Circuit Court, Court of Appeals, and the Supreme Court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 17, § 7, effective January 1, 1978.

15.733.
Disqualification of prosecuting attorney — Appointment of a special prosecutor.

For the purposes of this section the following words or phrases shall have the meaning indicated:

“Proceeding” includes pretrial, trial, appellate review, or other stages of litigation;

“Fiduciary” includes such relationships as executor, administrator, conservator, trustee, and guardian;

“Financial interest” means ownership of a legal or equitable interest, however small, or a relationship as director, adviser, or other active participant in the affairs of a party, except that:

Ownership in a mutual or common investment fund that holds securities, or a proprietary interest of a policyholder in a mutual insurance company, of a depositor in a mutual savings association, or a similar proprietary interest, or ownership of government securities is a “financial interest” only if the outcome of the proceeding could substantially affect the value of the interest;

An office in an educational, religious, charitable, fraternal, or civil organization is not a “financial interest” in securities held by the organization.

Any prosecuting attorney shall disqualify himself in any proceeding in which he or his spouse, or a member of his immediate family either individually or as a fiduciary:

Is a party to the proceeding, or an officer, director, or trustee of a party;

Is acting as a lawyer in the proceeding;

Is known by the prosecuting attorney to have an interest that could be substantially affected by the outcome of the proceeding;

Is to the prosecuting attorney’s knowledge likely to be a material witness in the proceeding;

Has served in private practice or government service, other than as a prosecuting attorney, as a lawyer or rendered a legal opinion in the matter in controversy;

Has a financial interest in the subject matter in controversy or in a party to the proceeding, or any other interest that could be substantially affected by the outcome of the proceeding.

Any prosecuting attorney may be disqualified by the court in which the proceeding is presently pending, upon a showing of actual prejudice.

In the event that a prosecuting attorney is disqualified, he shall certify such fact in writing to the Attorney General who may direct another Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney or an assistant attorney general as a special prosecutor to represent the Commonwealth in that proceeding.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 59, § 1; repealed and reenact., Acts 1980, ch. 188, § 10, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 141, § 42, effective July 1, 1982.

15.734.
Disqualification of prosecuting attorney due to indictment on a felony charge — Appointment of special prosecutor for duration of disqualification.

In the event a Commonwealth’s attorney or an assistant Commonwealth’s attorney, or a county attorney or an assistant county attorney is indicted by a duly-empaneled state or federal grand jury on any felony charge under the laws of this Commonwealth, or a similar charge in the federal courts, such charge shall result in his immediate disqualification from further acting as a prosecuting attorney during the pendency of the action in any state or federal court. Such charge or charges shall in no way limit his right to practice civil law, unless the right to do so would contravene some other statute or existing canon of legal ethics, nor shall the charge alone prevent said attorney from receiving the usual salary or allowances for expense of the office, which would otherwise be payable.

In the event such disqualification exists as to an assistant Commonwealth’s attorney or an assistant county attorney, the suspension of acting as a prosecuting attorney shall be exercised and enforced by the duly-elected Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney as applicable.

In the event the disqualification relates to a Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney, upon certification of such disqualification to the Attorney General by the circuit judge or district judge of the jurisdiction in which said prosecuting attorney has been duly elected, the Attorney General shall name an attorney to serve as special prosecutor for the Commonwealth for the duration of the disqualification. The attorney, in this instance, need not be a Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney as provided in KRS

15.730

.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a duly elected Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney from being a candidate for reelection if said election is to be held during the period of disqualification, so long as said prosecuting attorney has not been found guilty of a felony or entered a plea of guilty to a felony at the initial trial court level. A final conviction or a plea of guilty at the trial court level to a felony shall act as a bar to being a candidate for reelection.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 369, § 1, effective April 9, 1986.

15.735.
Disqualification — Assignment of another prosecutor.

Upon certification by the Commonwealth’s attorney and county attorneys to the Attorney General and for good cause shown that he, as the regular elected Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney, and his assistant or assistants, if any, should not participate in a particular prosecution arising in his judicial circuit or district, the Attorney General may direct another Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney as a special prosecutor for the Commonwealth to prosecute the action. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the appointment of a Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney pro tem, as provided in KRS

69.060

, where applicable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 17, § 8, effective January 1, 1978.

15.740.
Commonwealth’s attorney and county attorney not to represent accused.

The Commonwealth’s attorney and county attorney shall not act as defense counsel in any criminal prosecution in any state or federal court in this Commonwealth, except in cases in which he is a party.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 17, § 9, effective January 1, 1978.

15.745.
Construction of KRS Chapter 15.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as eliminating or limiting any of the other duties of the Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney as set out in the Kentucky Revised Statutes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 17, § 10, effective January 1, 1978.

15.750.
Budget — Payment of office expenses — Purchase of liability insurance.

Each Commonwealth’s attorney and each county attorney shall submit a proposed budget for his office to the Prosecutors Advisory Council to be included in the total budget of the unified prosecutorial system and submitted as part of the budget of the Office of the Attorney General in accordance with KRS Chapter 48. Nothing contained herein shall be construed as limiting, restricting, or terminating the authority of local governmental units, including cities, counties, and urban counties, to provide financial support for the office of any prosecutor.

Office expenses incurred by the Commonwealth’s attorney in the performance of his duties, as required by the Kentucky Revised Statutes, shall be paid by the Commonwealth.

Office expenses incurred by the county attorney in the performance of his duties as criminal prosecutor shall be paid by the Commonwealth.

Office expenses incurred by the county attorney in the performance of his duties as legal adviser to the county shall be paid by the fiscal court or by the urban-county council as required by the Kentucky Revised Statutes.

The Prosecutors Advisory Council, under such terms and conditions as it deems appropriate, may purchase or authorize the purchase of liability insurance on behalf of county attorneys, Commonwealth’s attorneys, and their employees to protect them from malpractice or otherwise, arising in the course or scope of their official duties. The purchase of liability insurance for or by county attorneys, Commonwealth’s attorneys, and their employees shall not constitute a waiver of any immunity or defense the insured may now or in the future assert under state or federal law, regulation, or rule.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, (Ex. Sess.), ch. 17, § 11; 1982, ch. 450, § 52, effective July 1, 1983; 1988, ch. 235, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

Opinions of Attorney General.

County attorney could legally conduct a private practice in the county attorney’s office, whether it is located in the courthouse or in a privately owned building as long as he pays the percentage of the rental value corresponding to the percentage of time the property is used for his private practice.

OAG 77-756

.

The state and county must separately bear that portion of the county attorney’s office rent based upon the percentage of time spent by him on prosecutorial business (state’s responsibility) and time spent on the county business (county’s responsibility) with the attorney being personally responsible for the remaining time spent on private practice.

OAG 77-763

.

The compensation of a grand jury reporter should be paid out of the state treasury in accordance with proper budgetary procedure.

OAG 78-27

.

The expense allowance under subsection (3) of this section relates narrowly to prosecutorial work while the expense allowance under KRS

15.765

relates to residual civil functions and neither allowance is compensation nor is formal accountability required except that expenses claimed under this section must be documented as required by the Executive Department for Finance and Administration (now Finance and Administration Cabinet).

OAG 78-241

.

Subsection (4) of this section mandates the fiscal court to provide a salary for the secretary of the county attorney in carrying out his work for the county.

OAG 78-745

.

This section, KRS

32.011

and KRS

67.083

, when read together, authorize a fiscal court to contribute county money to the payment of the salary of an assistant Commonwealth’s attorney.

OAG 79-190

.

Subsections (2) and (3) of this section were designed to provide reimbursement by the Department of Finance (now Finance and Administration Cabinet) to prosecutors for office expenses incurred in performing their prosecutorial functions and travel expenses relating to their prosecutorial function are reimbursable, regardless of whether the travel is within their districts or outside their districts, and formal accountability is necessary by way of documentation as required by the Department of Finance (now Finance and Administration Cabinet); the $500 and $250 (now $1000 and $500) monthly expense allowances, as contained in KRS 15.755(6) and 15.765(2), relate necessarily to residual civil functions performed for the state, and these allowances are not compensation and require no formal accountability.

OAG 80-304

.

It is mandatory that the state pay for the services of the grand jury stenographer, and the conclusion is the same where a special grand jury is impaneled pursuant to KRS

29A.220

.

OAG 80-490

.

Language of 1984 budget bill relating to the “caseload” concept for distribution of state funding of the state prosecutorial system was at variance with the budget law of KRS Ch. 15 and Ch. 48 and such budget bill remarks were unconstitutional.

OAG 84-184

.

15.753.
Indemnification from financial loss in legal actions for Attorney General, Commonwealth’s attorneys, county attorneys, and their staffs.

This section shall apply to:

The Attorney General and his or her staff;

A county attorney and his or her staff; and

A Commonwealth’s attorney and his or her staff.

A person named in subsection (1) of this section who is sued for any act or omission in the course of his or her duties and who suffers actual financial loss, unreimbursed from any source, including any costs or attorney’s fees awarded as a result of the action, or any costs or reasonable attorney’s fees incurred in defending the action, shall be indemnified by the Commonwealth from funds appropriated to the Finance and Administration Cabinet for the payment of judgments, to the extent of his or her actual financial loss.

The indemnification shall be contingent upon an express determination by the Prosecutor’s Advisory Council that the act or omission which resulted in liability or financial loss was within the scope and course of the officer’s employment and occurred during the performance of duty and was committed or omitted in the good faith belief that the act or omission was lawful and proper.

If the officer seeking indemnification is the Attorney General, the determination referred to in subsection (3) of this section shall be made by the Governor.

The indemnification shall not be construed to abrogate or limit any privilege, immunity, or matter of defense otherwise available to the person claiming indemnification and shall not constitute a waiver of any privilege, immunity, or matter or defense including the sovereign immunity of the Commonwealth.

The indemnification shall not be the subject of comment, directly or indirectly, before any jury hearing any cause of action in which the Attorney General, a county or Commonwealth’s attorney, or a member of their staff is a party, and any comment before the jury shall result in an immediate mistrial.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 398, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2021 ch. 131, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.